Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.100

Indebtedness limit—Without popular vote.

Every metropolitan park district through its board of commissioners may contract indebtedness and evidence such indebtedness by the issuance and sale of warrants, short-term obligations as provided by chapter 39.50 RCW, or general obligation bonds, for any purposes authorized for such metropolitan park district and the extension and maintenance thereof, not exceeding, together with all other outstanding nonvoter approved general indebtedness, one-quarter of one percent of the value of the taxable property in such metropolitan park district, as the term "value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015. General obligation bonds may not be issued with a maximum term in excess of the maximum term set forth in chapter 39.46 RCW. Such general obligation bonds must be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 2017 c 215 s 2; 1993 c 247 s 1; 1989 c 319 s 2; 1984 c 186 s 21; 1983 c 61 s 1; 1970 ex.s. c 42 s 14; 1965 c 7 s 35.61.100. Prior: 1943 c 264 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6741-6; prior: 1927 c 268 s 1; 1907 c 98 s 6; RRS s 6725.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Severability—Effective date—1970 ex.s. c 42: See notes following RCW 39.36.015.